California statutes. Vehicle Code
(E) Hindering, delaying, or rejecting the proper and timely payment of compensation due under this section to a franchisee.

(F) Establishing, implementing, enforcing, or applying any discriminatory policy, standard, rule, program, or incentive regarding compensation due under this section.

(G) Conducting or threatening to
 conduct nonroutine or nonrandom warranty, nonwarranty repair, or other service-related audits in response to a franchisee seeking compensation or exercising any right pursuant to this section.

(3) This subdivision does not prohibit a franchisor from increasing prices of vehicles or parts in the ordinary course of business.

(j) As used in this section, a “qualified repair order” is a repair order, closed at the time of submission, for work that was performed outside of the period of the manufacturer’s warranty and paid for by the customer, but that would have been covered by a manufacturer’s warranty if the work had been required and performed during the period of warranty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 265.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.25.

As used in Sections 3065, 3065.2, and 3065.4, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Parts” includes, but is not limited to, engine, transmission, and other part assemblies.

(b) “Warranty” includes a new vehicle warranty, a certified preowned warranty, a repair pursuant to a technical service bulletin on a vehicle covered under the period of warranty, a repair pursuant to a customer service campaign on a vehicle covered under the period of warranty, and a recall conducted pursuant to Sections 30118 to 30120, inclusive, of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 13.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.3.

(a) No franchisor shall establish or maintain a performance standard, sales objective, or program for measuring a dealer’s sales, service, or customer service performance that is inconsistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 11713.13.

(b) No franchisor shall allocate vehicles or parts in a manner inconsistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11713.3.

(c) No franchisor shall impose a facility or equipment policy inconsistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (k) of Section 11713.13.

(d) No
 franchisor shall compete with a dealer in violation of subdivision (o) of Section 11713.3.

(e) A franchisee may file a protest with the board for determination of whether a franchisor has complied with this section and in that proceeding the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3065.4.

(a) If a franchisor fails to comply with Section 3065.2, or if a franchisee disputes the franchisor’s proposed adjusted retail labor rate or retail parts rate, the franchisee may file a protest with the board for a declaration of the franchisee’s retail labor rate or retail parts rate. In any protest under this section, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof that it complied with Section 3065.2 and that the franchisee’s determination of the retail labor rate or retail parts rate is materially inaccurate or fraudulent.

(b) Upon a decision by the board pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may determine the difference between the amount the franchisee has
 actually received from the franchisor for fulfilled warranty obligations and the amount that the franchisee would have received if the franchisor had compensated the franchisee at the retail labor rate and retail parts rate as determined in accordance with Section 3065.2 for a period beginning 30 days after receipt of the franchisee’s initial submission under subdivision (a) of Section 3065.2. The franchisee may submit a request to the franchisor to calculate the unpaid warranty reimbursement compensation and the franchisor shall provide this calculation to the franchisee within 30 days after receipt of the request. The request for the calculation will also be deemed a request for payment of the unpaid warranty reimbursement compensation.

(c) If the franchisor fails to make full payment within 30 days after the franchisee submits a request
 for payment, the franchisee may file an action in superior court for injunctive and other appropriate relief to enforce the determination or order of the board. The franchisee may also recover in superior court its actual reasonable expenses in bringing and maintaining an enforcement action in superior court.

(d) Either the franchisor or the franchisee may seek judicial review of the board’s determination pursuant to Section 3068.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 15.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3066.

(a) Upon receiving a protest pursuant to Section 3060, 3062, 3064, 3065, 3065.1, 3065.3, or 3065.4, the board shall fix a time within 60 days of the order, and place of hearing, and shall send by certified mail a copy of the order to the franchisor, the protesting franchisee, and all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions of the board. Except in a case involving a franchisee who deals exclusively in motorcycles, the board or its executive director may, upon a showing of good cause, accelerate or postpone the date initially established for a hearing, but the hearing shall not be rescheduled more than 90 days
 after the board’s initial order. For the purpose of accelerating or postponing a hearing date, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, the effects upon, and any irreparable harm to, the parties or interested persons or groups if the request for a change in hearing date is not granted. The board or an administrative law judge designated by the board shall hear and consider the oral and documented evidence introduced by the parties and other interested individuals and groups, and the board shall make its decision solely on the record so made. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Sections 11507.3, 11507.6, 11507.7, 11511, 11511.5, 11513, 11514, 11515, and 11517 of the Government Code apply to these proceedings.

(b) In a hearing on a protest filed pursuant to Section 3060
 or 3062, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof to establish that
 there is good cause to modify, replace, terminate, or refuse to continue a franchise. The franchisee shall have the burden of proof to establish that there is good cause not to enter into a franchise establishing an additional motor vehicle dealership or relocating an existing motor vehicle dealership.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in a hearing on a protest alleging a violation of, or filed pursuant to, Section 3064, 3065, or 3065.1, the franchisee shall have the burden of proof, but the franchisor has the burden of proof to establish that a franchisee acted with intent to defraud the franchisor when that issue is material to a protest filed pursuant to Section 3065 or 3065.1.

(d) In a hearing on a protest filed pursuant to Section 3065.3, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof to establish that the franchisor complied with subdivision (g) of Section 11713.13.

(e) In a hearing on a protest filed pursuant to Section 3065.4, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof to establish that the franchisor complied with Section 3065.2 and that the franchisee’s determination of the retail labor rate or retail parts rate is materially inaccurate or fraudulent.

(f) A member of the board who is a new motor vehicle dealer may
 not participate in, hear, comment, or advise other members upon, or decide, a matter involving a protest filed pursuant to this article unless all parties to the protest stipulate otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 16.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3067.

(a) The decision of the board shall be in writing and shall contain findings of fact and a determination of the issues presented. The decision shall sustain, conditionally sustain, overrule, or conditionally overrule the protest. Conditions imposed by the board shall be for the purpose of assuring performance of binding contractual agreements between franchisees and franchisors or otherwise serving the purposes of this article. If the board fails to act within 30 days after the hearing, within 30 days after the board receives a proposed decision when the case is heard before an administrative law judge alone, or within a period necessitated by Section 11517 of the Government Code, or as may be mutually agreed upon by the parties, then the
 proposed action shall be deemed to be approved. Copies of the board’s decision shall be delivered to the parties personally or sent to them by certified mail, as well as to all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions by the board. The board’s decision shall be final upon its delivery or mailing and a reconsideration or rehearing is not permitted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code, if a protest is heard by an administrative law judge alone, 10 days after receipt by the board of the administrative law judge’s proposed decision, a copy of the proposed decision shall be filed by the board as a public record and a copy shall be served by the board on each party and his or her attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3068.

Either party may seek judicial review of final decisions of the board. Time for filing for the review shall not be more than 45 days from the date on which the final order of the board is made public and is delivered to the parties personally or is sent to them by certified mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 5.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3069.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable to all franchises existing between dealers and manufacturers, manufacturer branches, distributors and distributor branches at the time of its enactment and to all such future franchises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

3069.1.

Sections 3060 to 3065.4, inclusive, do not apply to a franchise authorizing a dealership, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3072.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 7.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Hearings on Recreational Vehicle Franchise Modification, Replacement, Termination, Refusal to Continue, Establishment, and Relocation, and Consumer Complaints [3070. - 3082.]

3070.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 20999.1 of the Business and Professions Code or the terms of any franchise, a franchisor of a dealer of new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, except a dealer who deals exclusively in truck campers, may not terminate or refuse to continue a franchise unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The franchisee and the board have received written notice from the franchisor as follows:

(A) Sixty days before the effective date thereof setting forth the specific grounds for termination or refusal to continue.

(B) Fifteen days before the effective date thereof setting forth the specific grounds with respect to any of the following:

(i) Transfer of any ownership or interest in the franchise without the consent of the franchisor, which consent may not be unreasonably withheld.

(ii) Misrepresentation by the franchisee in applying for the franchise.

(iii) Insolvency of the franchisee, or filing of any petition by or against the franchisee under any bankruptcy or receivership law.

(iv) Any unfair business practice after written warning thereof.

(v) Failure of the dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary hours of business for seven consecutive
 business days, giving rise to a good faith belief on the part of the franchisor that the recreational vehicle dealer is in fact going out of business, except for circumstances beyond the direct control of the recreational vehicle dealer or by order of the department.

(C) The written notice shall contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, one of the following statements, whichever is applicable:

(i) To be inserted when a 60-day notice of termination is given:

“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the termination of your franchise under provisions of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 30 calendar
 days after receiving this notice or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest right will be waived.”

(ii) To be inserted when a 15-day notice of termination is given:

“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the termination of your franchise under provisions of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 10 calendar days after receiving this notice or within 10 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest right will be waived.”

(2) Except as provided in Section 3050.7, the board finds that there is good cause for termination or refusal to continue, following a hearing called pursuant to Section
 3080. The franchisee may file a protest with the board within 30 days after receiving a 60-day notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, or within 10 days after receiving a 15-day notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 10 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor. When a protest is filed, the board shall advise the franchisor that a timely protest has been filed, that a hearing is required pursuant to Section 3080, and that the franchisor may not terminate or refuse to continue until the board makes its findings.

(3) The franchisor has received the written consent
 of the franchisee, or the appropriate period for filing a protest has elapsed.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 20999.1 of the Business and Professions Code or the terms of any franchise, a franchisor of a dealer of recreational vehicles may not modify or replace a franchise with a succeeding franchise if the modification or replacement would substantially affect the franchisee’s sales or service obligations or investment, unless the franchisor has first given the board and each affected franchisee written notice thereof at least 60 days in advance of the modification or replacement. Within 30 days of receipt of a notice satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, a franchisee may file a protest with the board and the modification or replacement does not become effective until there is a finding by the board that there is good cause for the
 modification or replacement. If, however, a replacement franchise is the successor franchise to an expiring or expired term franchise, the prior franchise shall continue in effect until resolution of the protest by the board. In the event of multiple protests, hearings shall be consolidated to expedite the disposition of the issue.

(2) The written notice shall contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, the following statement:

“NOTICE TO DEALER: Your franchise agreement is being modified or replaced. If the modification or replacement will substantially affect your sales or service obligations or investment, you have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing in which you may protest the proposed modification or replacement of your franchise under provisions
 of the California Vehicle Code. You must file your protest with the board within 30 calendar days of your receipt of this notice or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor or your protest rights will be waived.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 6.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3071.

In determining whether good cause has been established for modifying, replacing, terminating, or refusing to continue a franchise of a dealer of new recreational vehicles, the board shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The amount of business transacted by the franchisee, as compared to the business available to the franchisee.

(b) The investment necessarily made and obligations incurred by the franchisee to perform its part of the franchise.

(c) The permanency of the investment.

(d) Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for the franchise to be modified or replaced or the business of the franchisee disrupted.

(e) Whether the franchisee has adequate new recreational vehicle sales and, if required by the franchise, service facilities, equipment, vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel, to reasonably provide for the needs of the consumers of the recreational vehicles handled by the franchisee and has been and is rendering adequate services to the public.

(f) Whether the franchisee fails to fulfill the warranty obligations agreed to be performed by the franchisee in the franchise.

(g) The extent of franchisee’s failure to comply with the terms of the franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 703, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3072.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if a franchisor seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional recreational vehicle dealership, or seeks to relocate an existing recreational vehicle dealership, that has a relevant market area in which the same recreational vehicle line-make is represented, the franchisor shall, in writing, first notify the board and each franchisee in that recreational vehicle line-make in the relevant market area of the franchisor’s intention to establish an additional dealership or to relocate an existing dealership. Within 20 days of receiving the notice, satisfying the requirements of this section, or within 20 days after the end of
 any appeal procedure provided by the franchisor, any franchisee required to be given the notice may file with the board a protest to the proposed dealership establishment or relocation described in the franchisor’s notice. If, within this time, a franchisee files with the board a request for additional time to file a protest, the board or its executive director, upon a showing of good cause, may grant an additional 10 days to file the protest. When a protest is filed, the board shall inform the franchisor that a timely protest has been filed, that a hearing is required pursuant to Section 3080, and that the franchisor shall not establish the proposed dealership or relocate the existing dealership until the board has held a hearing as provided in Section 3080, nor thereafter, if the board has determined that there is good cause for not permitting the establishment of the proposed recreational
 vehicle dealership or relocation of the existing recreational vehicle dealership. In the event of multiple protests, hearings may be consolidated to expedite the disposition of the issue.

(2) The written notice shall contain, on the first page thereof in at least 12-point bold type and circumscribed by a line to segregate it from the rest of the text, the following statement:

“NOTICE TO DEALER: You have the right to file a protest with the NEW MOTOR VEHICLE BOARD in Sacramento and have a hearing on your protest under the terms of the California Vehicle Code if you oppose this action. You must file your protest with the board within 20 days of your receipt of this notice, or within 20 days after the end of any appeal procedure that is provided by us to you. If, within this time, you file with the board a
 request for additional time to file a protest, the board or its executive director, upon a showing of good cause, may grant you an additional 10 days to file the protest.”

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The relocation of an existing dealership to any location that is both within the same city as, and within one mile of, the existing dealership location.

(2) The establishment at any location that is both within the same city as, and within one-quarter mile of, the location of a dealership of the same recreational vehicle line-make that has been out of operation for less than 90 days.

(3) A display of vehicles at a fair, exposition, or
 similar exhibit if no actual sales are made at the event and the display does not exceed 30 days. This paragraph may not be construed to prohibit a new vehicle dealer from establishing a branch office for the purpose of selling vehicles at the fair, exposition, or similar exhibit, even though that event is sponsored by a financial institution, as defined in Section 31041 of the Financial Code, or by a financial institution and a licensed dealer. The establishment of these branch offices, however, shall be in accordance with subdivision (a) where applicable.

(4) An annual show sponsored by a national trade association of recreational vehicle manufacturers that complies with all of the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 11713.15.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the
 reopening of a dealership that has not been in operation for one year or more shall be deemed the establishment of an additional recreational vehicle dealership.

(d) For the purposes of this section and Section 3073, a “recreational vehicle dealership” or “dealership” is any authorized facility at which a franchisee offers for sale or lease, displays for sale or lease, or sells or leases new recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code. A “recreational vehicle dealership” or “dealership” does not include a dealer who deals exclusively in truck campers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 7.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3072.5.

For the purposes of this article, a “recreational vehicle line-make” is a group or groups of recreational vehicles defined by the terms of a written agreement that complies with Section 331.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 8.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3073.

In determining whether good cause has been established for not entering into a recreational vehicle franchise or relocating an existing dealership of the same recreational vehicle line-make, the board shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The permanency of the investment.

(b) The effect on the retail recreational vehicle business and the consuming public in the relevant market area.

(c) Whether it is injurious to the public welfare for an additional recreational vehicle
 franchise to be established or an existing dealership be relocated.

(d) Whether the franchisees of the same recreational vehicle line-make in the relevant market area are providing adequate competition and convenient consumer care for the motor vehicles of the recreational vehicle line-make in the market area. In making this determination, the board shall consider the adequacy of recreational vehicle sales and, if required by the franchise, service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel.

(e) Whether the establishment of an additional franchise would increase competition and therefore be in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 9.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3074.

(a) A franchisor shall specify to its franchisees the delivery and preparation obligations of the franchisees prior to delivery of new recreational vehicles to retail buyers. A copy of the delivery and preparation obligations, which shall constitute the franchisee’s only responsibility for product liability between the franchisee and the franchisor but which shall not in any way affect the franchisee’s responsibility for product liability between the purchaser and either the franchisee or the franchisor, and a schedule of compensation to be paid franchisees for the work and services they shall be required to perform in connection with the delivery and preparation obligations shall be filed with the board by
 franchisors, and shall constitute the compensation as set forth on the schedule. The schedule of compensation shall be reasonable, with the reasonableness thereof being subject to the approval of the board, if a franchisee files a notice of protest with the board. In determining the reasonableness of the schedules, the board shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the time required to perform each function that the dealer is obligated to perform and the appropriate labor rate.

(b) Upon delivery of the vehicle, the franchisee shall give a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations to the purchaser and a written certification that the franchisee has fulfilled these obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 10.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3075.

(a) A franchisor shall properly fulfill every warranty agreement made by it and adequately and fairly compensate each of its franchisees for labor and parts used to fulfill that warranty when the franchisee has fulfilled warranty obligations of repair and servicing and shall file a copy of its warranty reimbursement schedule or formula with the board. The warranty reimbursement schedule or formula shall be reasonable with respect to the time and compensation allowed the franchisee for the warranty work and all other conditions of the obligation. The reasonableness of the warranty reimbursement schedule or formula shall be determined by the board if a franchisee files a notice of protest with the board.

(b) In determining the adequacy and fairness of the compensation, the franchisee’s effective labor rate charged to its various retail customers may be considered together with other relevant criteria.

(c) If a franchisor disallows a franchisee’s claim for a defective part, alleging that the part, in fact, is not defective, the franchisor shall return the part alleged not to be defective to the franchisee at the expense of the franchisor, or the franchisee shall be reimbursed for the franchisee’s cost of the part, at the franchisor’s option.

(d) All claims made by franchisees pursuant to this section shall be either approved or disapproved within 30 days after their receipt by the franchisor. A claim not specifically disapproved in writing within 30 days from receipt by the franchisor shall be deemed approved on the 30th day. When a claim is disapproved, the franchisee who submits it shall be notified in writing of its disapproval within the required period, and the notice shall state the specific grounds upon which the disapproval is based. All claims made by franchisees under this section and Section 3074 for labor and parts shall be paid within 30 days following approval. Failure to approve or pay within the above specified time limits, in individual instances for reasons beyond the reasonable control of the franchisor, do not constitute a violation of this article.

(e) Audits of franchisee warranty records may be conducted by the franchisor on a reasonable basis, and for a period of 12 months after a claim is paid or credit issued. Franchisee claims for warranty compensation shall not be disapproved except for good cause, including, but not limited to, performance of nonwarranty repairs, lack of material documentation, or fraud. Any chargeback to a franchisee for warranty parts or service compensation shall be made within 90 days of the completion of the audit. If a false claim was submitted by a franchisee with intent to defraud the franchisor, a longer period for audit and any resulting chargeback may be permitted if the franchisor obtains an order from the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 703, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3076.

(a) All claims made by a franchisee for payment under the terms of a franchisor incentive program shall be either approved or disapproved within 30 days after receipt by the franchisor. When a claim is disapproved, the franchisee who submits it shall be notified in writing of its disapproval within the required period, and each notice shall state the specific grounds upon which the disapproval is based. A claim not specifically disapproved in writing within 30 days from receipt shall be deemed approved on the 30th day. Following the disapproval of a claim, a franchisee shall have one year from receipt of the notice of disapproval in which to appeal the disapproval to the franchisor and file a protest with the board. All claims made by franchisees under this section shall be paid within 30 days following approval. Failure to approve or pay within the above specified time limits, in individual instances for reasons beyond the reasonable control of the franchisor, do not constitute a violation of this article.

(b) Audits of franchisee incentive records may be conducted by the franchisor on a reasonable basis, and for a period of 18 months after a claim is paid or credit issued. Franchisee claims for incentive program compensation shall not be disapproved except for good cause, such as ineligibility under the terms of the incentive program, lack of material documentation, or fraud. Any chargeback to a franchisee for incentive program compensation shall be made within 90 days of the completion of the audit. If a false claim was submitted by a franchisee with the intent to defraud the franchisor, a longer period for audit and any resulting chargeback may be permitted if the franchisor obtains an order from the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 703, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3077.

(a) In addition to fees imposed under Sections 3016 and 11723, the department shall impose a one-time additional fee on those dealers subject to this article for the issuance or renewal of a license, in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the department and the board in the implementation of this article for the first year, or in an amount sufficient to cover costs of not more than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), whichever amount is less.

(b) The fee authorized under subdivision (a) may not be imposed on and after January 1, 2005.

(c) All funds derived from the imposition of the fee required under subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund and shall be available, upon appropriation, for expenditure to cover the costs incurred by the department and the board in the initial implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 703, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3078.

(a) If the board receives a complaint from a member of the public seeking a refund involving the sale or lease of, or a replacement of, a recreational vehicle, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, from a recreational vehicle dealership, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3072, the board shall recommend that the complainant consult with the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) This chapter does not affect a person’s rights regarding a transaction involving a recreational vehicle as defined in subdivision (a), to maintain an action under any other statute, including, but not limited to, applicable
 provisions of Title 1.7 (commencing with Section 1790) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 11.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3079.

This article applies only to a recreational vehicle franchise entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 12.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3080.

(a) Upon receiving a protest pursuant to Section 3070, 3072, 3074, 3075, or 3076, the board shall fix a time and place of hearing within 60 days of the order, and shall send by certified mail a copy of the order to the franchisor, the protesting franchisee, and all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions of the board. The board or its executive director may, upon a showing of good cause, accelerate or postpone the date initially established for a hearing, but the hearing shall not be rescheduled more than 90 days after the board’s initial order. For the purpose of accelerating or postponing a hearing date, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, the effects upon, and any
 irreparable harm to, the parties or interested persons or groups if the request for a change in hearing date is not granted. The board or an administrative law judge designated by the board shall hear and consider the oral and documented evidence introduced by the parties and other interested individuals and groups, and the board shall make its decision solely on the record so made. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Sections 11507.3, 11507.6, 11507.7, 11511, 11511.5, 11513, 11514, 11515, and 11517 of the Government Code apply to these proceedings.

(b) In a hearing on a protest filed pursuant to Section 3070 or 3072, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof to establish that there is good cause to modify, replace, terminate, or refuse to continue a franchise. The
 franchisee shall have the burden of proof to establish that there is good cause not to enter into a franchise establishing an additional recreational vehicle dealership or relocating an existing recreational vehicle dealership.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in a hearing on a protest alleging a violation of, or filed pursuant to, Section 3074, 3075, or 3076, the franchisee shall have the burden of proof, but the franchisor has the burden of proof to establish that a franchisee acted with intent to defraud the franchisor when that issue is material to a protest filed pursuant to Section 3075 or 3076.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 13.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3081.

(a) The decision of the board shall be in writing and shall contain findings of fact and a determination of the issues presented. The decision shall sustain, conditionally sustain, overrule, or conditionally overrule the protest. Conditions imposed by the board shall be for the purpose of assuring performance of binding contractual agreements between franchisees and franchisors or otherwise serving the purposes of this article. If the board fails to act within 30 days after the hearing, within 30 days after the board receives a proposed decision when the case is heard before an administrative law judge alone, or within a period necessitated by Section 11517 of the Government Code, or as may be mutually agreed upon by the
 parties, then the proposed action shall be deemed to be approved. Copies of the board’s decision shall be delivered to the parties personally or sent to them by certified mail, as well as to all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions by the board. The board’s decision shall be final upon its delivery or mailing and a reconsideration or rehearing is not permitted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code, if a protest is heard by an administrative law judge alone, 10 days after receipt by the board of the administrative law judge’s proposed decision, a copy of the proposed decision shall be filed by the board as a public record and a copy shall be served by the board on each party and his or her attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 14.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3082.

Either party may seek judicial review of final decisions of the board. Time for filing for the review shall not be more than 45 days from the date on which the final order of the board is made public and is delivered to the parties personally or is sent to them by certified mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 15.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Export and Sale-for-Resale Prohibition Hearings [3085. - 3085.10.]

3085.

(a) An association may bring a protest challenging the legality of an export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy of a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch at any time on behalf of two or more dealers subject to the challenged policy pursuant to subdivision (y) of Section 11713.3.

(b) For the purpose of this article, an association is an organization primarily owned by, or comprised of, new motor vehicle dealers and that primarily represents the interests of dealers.

(c) Relief for a protest pursuant to this section is limited to a declaration that an export or sale-for-resale
 prohibition policy of a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch violates the prohibitions of subdivision (y) of Section 11713.3. No monetary relief may be sought on behalf of the association or any dealers represented by the association.

(d) In a protest pursuant to this section, the association shall have the burden of proof to show that the challenged export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy violates subdivision (y) of Section 11713.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 3085.10.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.2.
